Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; URBAN DEBATE LEAGUE.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to the Minnesota Urban Debate League to offer improved professional development programming and expand services to youth in more geographic areas. new text end